Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0105

Powers.

Unless its articles of organization provide otherwise, a limited cooperative association has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and has the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities and affairs. An association may maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the association by the member's violation of a duty to the association or of the organic law or organic rules.

[ 2019 c 37 s 105.]